Tennessee, session 114, SB1782.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-8-306, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) A local government adopting a prohibition of class 1 or class 2 electric
bicycles on a bicycle path or trail in a public park or greenway owned or operated by the
local government may submit a copy of the resolution or ordinance to the department of
safety. Upon notice of a prohibition, the department may compile and publish to its
website a list of public parks and greenways where operation of a class 1 or class 2
electric bicycle is prohibited by a county or municipality pursuant to subsection (a).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1782
011398
- 1 -